Missouri, session 2026, SB1238.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 160 and 174, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto two new sections, to be known as sections
160.2510 and 174.805, to read as follows:
160.2510. 1. As used in this section, "public school"
means any school building operated by a school district and
any charter school established under sections 160.400 to
160.425.
2. When providing instruction on the topic of American
history, a teacher in a public school shall provide
instruction on the positive impacts of religion on American
history, which shall include the following historical
accounts:
(1) The authentic history of the pilgrims, including
the following:
(a) The organization of the pilgrims as a church;
(b) The history of the portrait of the pilgrims
displayed in the United States Capitol rotunda, which
depicts prayer, an open bible, and the inscription "God with
Us" on the sail;

SB 1238 2
(c) The religious implications of the Mayflower
Compact, which was modeled on a church covenant;
(d) The treaty with the Native Americans signed and
upheld by the pilgrims; and
(e) The first Thanksgiving that was observed as an act
of gratitude towards God;
(2) The appeals to divine power and protection
embedded in the Declaration of Independence;
(3) The appeal made to the biblical exodus in the
fight for independence;
(4) The religious background of the signers of the
Declaration of Independence;
(5) The influence of religious leaders like Reverend
John Witherspoon who signed the Declaration of Independence;
(6) The impact of the first and second great
awakenings on public policy;
(7) George Washington's direction regarding chaplains
in the army;
(8) George Washington's farewell address calling
religion and morality "indispensable supports" that lead to
political prosperity and their tributes to patriotism "great
pillars of human happiness" and the "firmest props of the
duties of men and citizens";
(9) Benjamin Franklin's appeal for prayer at the
constitutional convention and the hiring of chaplains that
followed;
(10) The influence of religion on the United States
Constitution, as evidenced by the exclusion of Sunday from
the allotted time for the president to sign or veto a bill
and the dating of the Constitution according to the birth of
Christ;

SB 1238 3
(11) Reverend John Leland's influence that led James
Madison to advocate for a bill of rights including the First
Amendment to the United States Constitution;
(12) The history of the concept of the separation of
church and state dating back to its religious origins with
Roger Williams;
(13) The influence and debates of Reverend John Peter
Gabriel Muhlenberg and his brother Reverend Frederick
Augustus Muhlenberg, the first Speaker of the United States
House of Representatives;
(14) The historic role of the black robe regiment;
(15) The nation's response to Thomas Paine's "The Age
of Reason", including Benjamin Franklin's suggestion that he
burn it, the national rejection of it, and multiple
responses to it including Elias Boudinot's, "The Age of
Revelation";
(16) The role of the Ten Commandments in shaping
American law and their presence in art and sculpture
embedded in the United States Supreme Court;
(17) How religious influence shaped civil rights and
the civil rights movement through men like Booker T.
Washington, Frederick Douglass, Dr. Martin Luther King Jr.,
and others;
(18) The impact of religious leaders such as
evangelist minister Billy Graham on the culture of this
nation; and
(19) The history of the national motto "In God We
Trust", dating back to the national anthem and traced
through its appearance on currency and the inclusion of
"under God" in this nation's pledge of allegiance.
174.805. When providing instruction on the topic of
American history, an instructor at a public institution of

SB 1238 4
higher education may provide instruction on the positive
impacts of religion on American history, which may include
the following historical accounts:
(1) The authentic history of the pilgrims, including
the following:
(a) The organization of the pilgrims as a church;
(b) The history of the portrait of the pilgrims
displayed in the United States Capitol rotunda, which
depicts prayer, an open bible, and the inscription "God with
Us" on the sail;
(c) The religious implications of the Mayflower
Compact, which was modeled on a church covenant;
(d) The treaty with the Native Americans signed and
upheld by the pilgrims; and
(e) The first Thanksgiving that was observed as an act
of gratitude towards God;
(2) The appeals to divine power and protection
embedded in the Declaration of Independence;
(3) The appeal made to the biblical exodus in the
fight for independence;
(4) The religious background of the signers of the
Declaration of Independence;
(5) The influence of religious leaders like Reverend
John Witherspoon who signed the Declaration of Independence;
(6) The impact of the first and second great
awakenings on public policy;
(7) George Washington's direction regarding chaplains
in the army;
(8) George Washington's farewell address calling
religion and morality "indispensable supports" that lead to
political prosperity and their tributes to patriotism "great

SB 1238 5
pillars of human happiness" and the "firmest props of the
duties of men and citizens";
(9) Benjamin Franklin's appeal for prayer at the
constitutional convention and the hiring of chaplains that
followed;
(10) The influence of religion on the United States
Constitution, as evidenced by the exclusion of Sunday from
the allotted time for the president to sign or veto a bill
and the dating of the Constitution according to the birth of
Christ;
(11) Reverend John Leland's influence that led James
Madison to advocate for a bill of rights including the First
Amendment to the United States Constitution;
(12) The history of the concept of the separation of
church and state dating back to its religious origins with
Roger Williams;
(13) The influence and debates of Reverend John Peter
Gabriel Muhlenberg and his brother Reverend Frederick
Augustus Muhlenberg, the first Speaker of the United States
House of Representatives;
(14) The historic role of the black robe regiment;
(15) The nation's response to Thomas Paine's "The Age
of Reason", including Benjamin Franklin's suggestion that he
burn it, the national rejection of it, and multiple
responses to it including Elias Boudinot's, "The Age of
Revelation";
(16) The role of the Ten Commandments in shaping
American law and their presence in art and sculpture
embedded in the United States Supreme Court;
(17) How religious influence shaped civil rights and
the civil rights movement through men like Booker T.

SB 1238 6
Washington, Frederick Douglass, Dr. Martin Luther King Jr.,
and others;
(18) The impact of religious leaders such as
evangelist minister Billy Graham on the culture of this
nation; and
(19) The history of the national motto "In God We
Trust", dating back to the national anthem and traced
through its appearance on currency and the inclusion of
"under God" in this nation's pledge of allegiance.
✓